Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 64
988 CRISIS HOTLINE ENTERPRISE

Section

27-64-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

On July 16, 2020, the federal communications commission adopted rules, and on October 17, 2020, congress passed the "National Suicide Hotline Designation Act of 2020", designating 988 as the three-digit number for the national suicide prevention lifeline to aid rapid access to suicide prevention and mental health support services;

It is imperative for Colorado to implement 988 as the three-digit number for crisis response services in Colorado in order to comply with federal regulations; improve quality and access to behavioral health crisis services, especially for underserved populations and in rural areas of the state; and reduce stigma surrounding suicide, mental health, and substance use conditions;

The 988 crisis hotline enterprise provides valuable benefits and services to telephone service users when the enterprise funds the 988 crisis hotline and provides crisis outreach, stabilization, and acute care to individuals calling the 988 crisis hotline from any jurisdiction in Colorado twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week;

By providing the benefits and services specified in subsection (1)(c) of this section, the 988 crisis hotline enterprise engages in an activity conducted in the pursuit of a benefit, gain, or livelihood, and therefore operates as a business;

Consistent with the determination of the Colorado supreme court in Nicholl v. E-470 Public Highway Authority, 896 P.2d 859 (Colo. 1995), that the power to impose taxes is inconsistent with enterprise status under section 20 of article X of the state constitution, it is the conclusion of the general assembly that the charges imposed by the enterprise is a fee, not a tax, because the charges are imposed for the specific purpose of allowing the enterprise to defray the costs of providing the benefits and services specified in subsection (1)(c) of this section to telephone service users and the charges are imposed at rates that are reasonably calculated based on the cost of the services received by telephone service users;

So long as the 988 crisis hotline enterprise qualifies as an enterprise for purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution, the revenue from the charges imposed by the enterprise are not state fiscal year spending, as defined in section 24-77-102 (17), or state revenues, as defined in section 24-77-103.6 (6)(c), and do not count against either the state fiscal year spending limit imposed by section 20 article X of the state constitution or the excess state revenues cap, as defined in section 24-77-103.6 (6)(b)(I); and

No other enterprise created simultaneously or within the preceding five years serves primarily the same purpose as the 988 crisis hotline enterprise and the 988 crisis hotline enterprise will generate revenue from charges of less than one hundred million dollars total in its first five fiscal years. Accordingly, the creation of the 988 crisis hotline enterprise does not require voter approval pursuant to section 24-77-108.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire article added, (SB 21-154), ch. 360, p. 2343, § 1, effective September 7.

27-64-102. Definitions.

As used in this article 64, unless the context otherwise requires:

"988 crisis hotline" means a state-identified hotline participating in the national suicide prevention lifeline network to respond to statewide or regional behavioral health crisis calls.

(1.5) "Behavioral health administration" or "BHA" means the behavioral health administration established in section 27-50-102.

"Charge" means the 988 surcharge imposed by the enterprise pursuant to section 27-64-103 (4)(a) and the prepaid wireless 988 charge imposed by the enterprise pursuant to section 27-64-103 (4)(b).

"Enterprise" means the 988 crisis hotline enterprise created in section 27-64-103.

"National suicide prevention lifeline" means a national network of local crisis centers maintained by the federal substance abuse and mental health services administration that provides free and confidential emotional support to people in suicidal crisis or emotional distress twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week.

"Veterans crisis line" means the veterans crisis line maintained by the United States department of veterans affairs.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire article added, (SB 21-154), ch. 360, p. 2344, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(1.5) added, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1536, § 111, effective July 1.

27-64-103. 988 crisis hotline enterprise - creation - powers and duties.

There is created in the behavioral health administration the 988 crisis hotline enterprise. The enterprise is and operates as a government-owned business within the BHA for the business purpose of imposing charges pursuant to subsections (4)(a) and (4)(b) of this section, and utilizing the charges' revenue to fund the 988 crisis hotline and provide crisis outreach, stabilization, and acute care to individuals calling the 988 crisis hotline. The enterprise exercises its power and performs its duties as if the same were transferred by a type 1 transfer, as defined in section 24-1-105, to the BHA.

The enterprise constitutes an enterprise for purposes of section 20 of article X of the state constitution so long as it retains the authority to issue revenue bonds and receives less than ten percent of its total revenues in grants from all Colorado state and local governments combined. So long as it constitutes an enterprise pursuant to this subsection (2), the enterprise is not subject to section 20 of article X of the state constitution.

The enterprise is governed by a board of directors appointed by the governor.

The enterprise's primary powers and duties are to:

Effective January 1, 2022, impose a 988 surcharge on service users, as defined in section 40-17.5-101 (13), in an amount to be established annually by the enterprise, in collaboration with the public utilities commission, but not to exceed thirty cents per month per 988 access connection, as defined in section 40-17.5-101 (2). On or before October 1, 2021, and on or before October 1 of each year thereafter, the enterprise, in collaboration with the public utilities commission, shall establish the amount of the surcharge for the next calendar year. The amount of the surcharge must be reasonably calculated based on the cost of the services received by telephone service users. The amount of the surcharge imposed per 988 access connection must be uniform, regardless of the technology used to provide the 988 access connection.

Effective January 1, 2022, impose a prepaid wireless 988 charge on each retail transaction, as defined in section 40-17.5-104 (1)(d), in an amount to be established annually by the enterprise, in collaboration with the public utilities commission, but not to exceed thirty cents per each retail transaction in which prepaid wireless service is purchased in Colorado. On or before October 1, 2021, and on or before October 1 of each year thereafter, the enterprise, in collaboration with the public utilities commission, shall establish the amount of the charge for the next calendar year. The amount of the charge must be reasonably calculated to meet the needs of the enterprise.

As required by subsection (5) of this section, fund the 988 crisis hotline to provide intervention services and crisis care coordination to individuals calling the 988 crisis hotline;

Engage the services of third parties serving as crisis vendors to provide crisis outreach, stabilization, acute care, and marketing for the 988 crisis hotline;

Enter into any other contracts necessary for professional and technical assistance and advice and to supply other services related to the conduct of the affairs of the enterprise, without regard to the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24.

The BHA shall provide office space and administrative staff to the enterprise pursuant to a contract entered into pursuant to subsection (4)(d)(II) of this section.

By resolution, authorize and issue revenue bonds that are payable only from the money in the 988 crisis hotline cash fund created in section 27-64-104; and

Adopt, amend, or repeal policies for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business consistent with this section.

On or before July 1, 2022, the enterprise shall fund a nonprofit organization to operate the 988 crisis hotline and provide intervention services and crisis care coordination to individuals calling the 988 crisis hotline from any jurisdiction within Colorado twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week.

The nonprofit organization shall:

Have an active agreement with the administrator of the national suicide prevention lifeline for participation within the network;

Meet the national suicide prevention lifeline requirements and best practice guidelines for operational and clinical standards;

Meet the national suicide prevention lifeline requirements for serving high-risk and specialized populations;

Deploy mobile response units and co-responder programs that are part of the behavioral health crisis response system, created pursuant to section 27-60-103, and coordinate access to crisis walk-in centers, as appropriate; and

Provide follow-up services to individuals accessing the 988 crisis hotline.

The enterprise shall collaborate with the national suicide prevention lifeline and the veterans crisis line for the purpose of ensuring consistent public messaging about the 988 crisis hotline center and available services.

The enterprise shall consider recommendations from the state's 988 planning committee to determine how the 988 crisis hotline will interact with the twenty-four-hour telephone crisis services established in section 27-60-103 (1)(b)(I).

The enterprise is subject to the open meetings provisions of the "Colorado Sunshine Act of 1972", contained in part 4 of article 6 of title 24, and the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

For purposes of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24, and except as may otherwise be provided by federal law or regulation or state law, the records of the enterprise are public records, as defined in section 24-72-202 (6), regardless of whether the enterprise receives less than ten percent of its total annual revenue in grants, as defined in section 24-77-102 (7), from all Colorado state and local governments combined.

The enterprise is a public entity for purposes of part 2 of article 57 of title 11.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire article added, (SB 21-154), ch. 360, p. 2345, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(1) and (4)(d)(III) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1536, § 112, effective July 1.

27-64-104. 988 crisis hotline cash fund - creation.

The 988 crisis hotline cash fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", is created in the state treasury. The fund consists of money credited to the fund in accordance with article 17.5 of title 40.

The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of money in the fund to the fund.

Subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly, the enterprise may expend money from the fund for the purposes outlined in section 27-64-103 (4)(c) and (4)(d).

The board may seek, accept, and expend gifts, grants, or donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section, so long as the combination of grants from state and local governments is less than ten percent of the enterprise's total annual revenue.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire article added, (SB 21-154), ch. 360, p. 2347, § 1, effective September 7.

27-64-105. Reports.

Beginning January 1, 2023, and each January 1 thereafter, the BHA shall:

Submit information about the usage of the 988 crisis hotline and services provided to the federal substance abuse and mental health services administration and information about the expenditures of the 988 crisis hotline cash fund to the federal communications commission; and

Report progress on the implementation of the 988 crisis hotline, including the usage of the 988 crisis hotline, the services provided, and the deposits and expenditures from the 988 crisis hotline cash fund as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire article added, (SB 21-154), ch. 360, p. 2347, § 1, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

IP(1) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1537, § 113, effective July 1.